src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
! (??)
LEXICON V-merkitä
+V: V-merkitä_01 ;

LEXICON V-merkitä_01
+Ind+Prs+Sg1:tsen	#   ; ! oon
+Ind+Prs+Sg2:tset	#   ;
+Ind+Prs+Sg3:tsö%>%^LVws	K_V   ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl1:tse%>mmAÄ1	#   ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl2:tse%>ttAÄ1	#   ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:tsö%>%^LVwst	K_V   ;
+Ind+Prs+4:tAÄ1AÄ1	#   ;
+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:tse 	#   ;

:tsi IndPrt ;

+Ind+Prt+Pl3:t%>sivAÄ1t     K_V   ;
+Ind+Prt+Pl3:ttii     K_V   ;
!+Ind+ConNeg+Prt:%>%^WCnsttUY1         #   ;

:n PotPers ; ! merkinnöö
!+Pot+4:%>ttAÄ1%>nOÖ1%>OÖ1      #   ;
!+Pot+ConNeg:oo                #   ;

! +Cond+Sg1:olisin      #   ; ! oon
! +Cond+Sg2:olisit      #   ;
! +Cond+Sg3:olis      #   ;
! +Cond+Pl1:olisimma    #   ;
! +Cond+Pl2:olisitta    #   ;
! +Cond+Pl3:olisivat     #   ;
+Cond+4:%>ttAÄ1is      #   ;
! !+Cond+ConNeg:oo                #   ;
! 
:t ImprtPers_k ;
! +Imprt+Sg2:oo      #   ;
! +Imprt+4:oltakoo      #   ;
! !+Imprt+ConNeg:oo                #   ;
! 
:tsi V-actor_jA ; !
:tse V-ActPrsPrc ; ! merkitsevä
	V-ActPrtPrc_nt   ;
+PrsPrc:%>%^WCnsttAÄ1vAÄ1 A-tulova  ;
+PrtPrc:ttUY1  A-kova   ;
! 
+Inf:%>tAÄ1             #   ; ! merkitä
+Inf:tsemAÄ1  SG-ILL_V   ; ! antamaa
+Inf:tse%>mAÄ1 SG-INE   ;
! +Inf+Ela:olemast      #   ;
! +Inf+Abe:olemata      #   ;
! +Ger:ollees		#   ;
+Der/miin:tse%>mi N-inmihiin ;
+Der/miin:tsOÖ1mi%>%^LCns N-inmihiin ;

! (V)
LEXICON V-ahavojja
#;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! DERIVATION !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

! Actor in jA
LEXICON V-actor_jA
+Der/jA+N:jAÄ1 DER-tOin ; !
+Der/jA+N@U.POS.N@:j@U.POS.N@ V-actor_01 ;

LEXICON V-actor_01
:AÄ1 SG-NOM   ; ! osa
:AÄ1 SG-PAR_A-LCns   ; ! ossaa
:AÄ1 SG-ILL_V   ; ! ossaa
:AÄ1 Oblique-Singular ;
! Plural
:AÄ1 PL-NOM   ; ! osat
Use/Sub:OÖ1 PL-PAR_tA   ; ! tekijöitä
! PL-PAR_A-LCns   ; ! ossia
 PL-ILL_hV   ; ! ossii
:OÖ1 Oblique-Plural ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! PARTICIPLES !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

!!
LEXICON V-ActPrsPrc
+ActPrsPrc:vAÄ1 A-tulova ;
!!
LEXICON V-ActPrtPrc_nt
+Ind+Prt+ConNeg:nt K ;
+ActPrtPrc:nt    SG-NOM    ;
+ActPrtPrc:nUY1t SG-PAR_tA ;
+ActPrtPrc:ne V-ActPrtPrc_01 ;

LEXICON V-ActPrtPrc_rt
+Ind+Prt+ConNeg:t K ;
+ActPrtPrc:t    SG-NOM    ;
+ActPrtPrc:rrUY1t SG-PAR_tA ;
+ActPrtPrc:re V-ActPrtPrc_01 ;

LEXICON V-ActPrtPrc_lt
+Ind+Prt+ConNeg:t K ;
+ActPrtPrc:t    SG-NOM    ;
+ActPrtPrc:lUY1t SG-PAR_tA ;
+ActPrtPrc:le V-ActPrtPrc_01 ;

LEXICON V-ActPrtPrc_st
+Ind+Prt+ConNeg:t K ;
+ActPrtPrc:t    SG-NOM    ;
+ActPrtPrc:sUY1t SG-PAR_tA ;
+ActPrtPrc:se V-ActPrtPrc_01 ;

LEXICON V-ActPrtPrc_01
+Comp:emp MP	   ;
 N-lähe_01 ;
:e%>%^LCns SG-ILL_sse ;
:e%>%^LCns Oblique-Singular ;
:e%>%^LCns PL-NOM ;
:%>%^LCns PL-PAR_tA ;
:%>%^LCns PL-ILL_sse ;
:%>%^LCns Oblique-Plural ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! CONJUGATION !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! INDICATIVE PRETERITE !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON IndPrt
 IndPrt_1-2 ;
 IndPrt_3   ;

LEXICON IndPrt_1-2
 IND-PRT-SG1 ;
 IND-PRT-SG2 ;
 IND-PRT-PL1 ;
 IND-PRT-PL2 ;

LEXICON IndPrt_3
 IND-PRT-SG3 ;
 IND-PRT-PL3 ;

LEXICON IND-PRT-SG1
+Ind+Prt+Sg1:%>%^WCnsn       K_V   ; ! oon

LEXICON IND-PRT-SG2
+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%>%^WCnst       K_V   ;

LEXICON IND-PRT-SG3
+Ind+Prt+Sg3:        K_V   ;

LEXICON IND-PRT-PL1
+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%>%^WCnsmmAÄ1     K_V   ;

LEXICON IND-PRT-PL2
+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%>%^WCnsttAÄ1     K_V   ;

! This is not working 2012-10-30
LEXICON IND-PRT-PL3
+Dial/Lauk+Ind+Prt+Pl3:vAÄ1t   K_V   ;
+Dial/Soik+Ind+Prt+Pl3:V3t   K_V   ;




!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! CONDITIONAL !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON CondPers
+Cond+Sg1:isin K ;
+Cond+Sg2:isit K ;
+Dial/Soik+Cond+Sg2:ist K ;
+Cond+Sg3:is K ;
+Cond+Pl1:isimmAÄ1 K ;
+Cond+Pl2:isittAÄ1 K ;
+Dial/Soik+Cond+Pl3:isiit K ;
+Dial/Lauk+Cond+Pl3:isivAÄ1t K ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! POTENTIAL !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
! :n, :s, :l, :r, :n
LEXICON PotPers
+Pot+Sg1:en K_PotPers ;
+Pot+Sg2:et K_PotPers ;
+Pot+Sg3:OÖ1%>%^LCnsOÖ1 K_PotPers ;
+Pot+Pl1:emmAÄ1 K_PotPers ;
+Pot+Pl2:ettAÄ1 K_PotPers ;
+Pot+Pl3:OÖ1%>%^LCnsOÖ1t K_PotPers ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! IMPERATIVE !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON ImprtPers_k
+Imprt+Sg3:kOÖ1OÖ1    K_V   ;
+Dial/Soik+Imprt+Sg3:kAÄ1AÄ1      K_V   ;
+Imprt+Pl2:kAÄ1AÄ1    K_V   ;
+Imprt+Pl3:kOÖ1OÖ1t   K_V   ;
+Dial/Soik+Imprt+Pl3:kAÄ1AÄ1t    K_V   ;



! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
